Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 1. In General

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

21A Am. Jur. 2d Criminal Law §§ 939 to 975; 60 Am. Jur. 2d Penal and Correctional Institutions § 1 et seq.

Right to credit for time spent in custody prior to trial or sentence, 77 ALR3d 182.

Computation of incarceration time under work-release or “hardship” sentences, 28 ALR4th 1265.

Fourth amendment as protecting prison visitor against unreasonable searches and seizures, 69 ALR Fed 856.

24 C.J.S. Criminal Law §§ 1989, 2000; 43 C.J.S. Infants §§ 31 to 91, 196 to 214.

§ 7-13-101.
Sentencing of minors to boys' school upon first conviction of felony; term; parole.

Upon his first conviction of a felony, any male offender under the age of eighteen (18) years may be sentenced to imprisonment in the Wyoming boys’ school.

In imposing a sentence under this section the court shall not fix a definite or minimum term of confinement in the boys’ school but shall fix a maximum term which shall not exceed the maximum term provided for the statute violated.

The department of family services may at any time grant to a person sentenced under this section a parole from the boys’ school even though the person has not served a fixed minimum sentence.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 90, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 540; C.S. 1920, § 613; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 10; R.S. 1931, § 80-301; Laws 1941, ch. 5, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 11-405; Laws 1947, ch. 15, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-302; Laws 1971, ch. 92, § 11; 1985, ch. 181, § 1; 1987, ch. 77, § 1; ch. 157, § 3; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1993, ch. 1, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to Wyoming boys' school, see §

25-1-201

.

As to applicability of the DNA identification record system, see §§

7-19-401

et seq.

Court's discretion not taken away. —

The discretion conferred upon courts by this section was not taken away by the establishing of the industrial institute (now the Wyoming boys' school). Hukoveh v. Alston, 25 Wyo. 122, 165 P. 988,

1917 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1917).

Boys' school may be limited to first offenders. —

Legislature may provide that first offenders only shall be confined to industrial institute (now the Wyoming boys' school). Uram v. Roach, 47 Wyo. 335, 37 P.2d 793,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1934).

Cited

in

Apodaca v. State, 571 P.2d 603,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 299

(Wyo. 1977); Ryan v. State, 988 P.2d 46,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1999).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Institutional Transfer Statute: Three Challenges to the Imprisonment of Juvenile Offenders,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 643 (1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Application of rule of Dorszynski v. United States requiring that sentencing court make express finding of “no benefit” from treatment under Youth Corrections Act (18 USC §§ 5005 et seq.) (Repealed), 54 ALR Fed 382.

§ 7-13-102.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 25, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1909, ch. 90, § 6, related to the transfer of minors from the penitentiary to the boys' school.

§ 7-13-103.
Notice of sentence; transportation to institution; maintenance of prisoner in county jail.

If a person is sentenced to the custody of the department of corrections to serve a term of imprisonment in a state penal institution, the sheriff shall notify the department of corrections and the warden of the Wyoming medium correctional institution or the Wyoming women’s center.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the director of the department of corrections shall arrange for the transportation of the person to a state penal institution, at state expense, within ten (10) days after notification by the sheriff that the judgment and sentence has been signed by the judge. The court shall notify the sheriff immediately upon signing of the sentence by the judge. Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, prior to being transported to the institution the prisoner shall be maintained in the county jail at the expense of the county.

Upon agreement of the sheriff and the director of the department of corrections, the prisoner may be maintained at the county jail at an agreed per diem rate to be paid by the department for an additional period of not more than thirty (30) days after expiration of the ten (10) days provided by subsection (b) of this section. The department shall pay for any medical treatment of the prisoner, other than for conditions demanding immediate medical attention which can be treated at the county jail and other than medical treatment for which the county is liable under W.S. 18-6-303(c)(i), which is provided after the judgment and sentence is signed by the judge. Except for emergency medical treatment, no treatment which is the responsibility of the department under this subsection shall be provided without the prior approval of the department.

The sheriff shall furnish the department of corrections and the warden of the Wyoming state penitentiary or the Wyoming women’s center with a copy of the judgment and sentence imposed.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 76, § 9; R.S. 1887, § 1785; R.S. 1899, § 667; C.S. 1910, § 519; C.S. 1920, § 579; Laws 1921, ch. 61, § 1; 1923, ch. 45, § 1; 1931, ch. 73, § 6; R.S. 1931, § 108-801; Laws 1939, ch. 7, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 19-901; W.S. 1957, § 7-304; Laws 1987, ch. 138, § 1; ch. 157, § 3; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 1995, ch. 122, § 2; 2001, ch. 153, § 1; 2013 ch. 10, § 1, effective February 11, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “medium correctional institution” for state penitentiary” in (a); and in (b), added “notification by the sheriff that”, added the second sentence, and made a stylistic change.

Laws 2013, ch 10 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 11, 2013.

Auditing and payment of accounts for prisoner maintenance. —

Mandamus will issue to compel auditor to audit and treasurer either to pay account for proper maintenance of convicted criminals under statute providing for same, or to certify that there are no funds wherewith to pay, despite statute that no moneys shall be paid out of treasury unless especially appropriated by legislature. Donnellan v. Nicholls, 1 Wyo. 61,

1872 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1872).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Mandamus, under 28 USC § 1361, to obtain change in prison condition or release of federal prisoner, 114 ALR Fed 225.

§ 7-13-104.
Record of prisoners.

The department of corrections shall keep a complete record of the background and current status of all prisoners sentenced and confined in any state penal institution. The administrator of the institution where a prisoner is incarcerated, the division of criminal investigation, and the clerk of court and sheriff of the county from which the prisoner is committed shall, at the request of the department or the board of parole, furnish any information in their possession relating to the prisoner or the offense committed.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 76, § 10; R.S. 1887, § 1786; R.S. 1899, § 668; C.S. 1910, § 520; C.S. 1920, § 580; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 7; R.S. 1931, § 108-803; C.S. 1945, § 19-903; W.S. 1957, § 7-306; Laws 1971, ch. 92, § 13; W.S. 1977, §

7-13-105

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1992, ch. 25, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to division of criminal investigation, see §

9-1-611

.

§ 7-13-105.
Certificate of restoration of rights; procedure for restoration in general; procedure for restoration of voting rights for nonviolent felonies; filing requirements.

Upon receipt of a written application, the governor may issue to a person convicted of a felony under the laws of a state or the United States a certificate which restores the rights lost pursuant to W.S.

6-10-106

when:

His term of sentence expires; or

He satisfactorily completes a probation period.

The department of corrections shall issue a certificate of restoration of voting rights as provided in this subsection and subsection (c) of this section. Upon issuance of a certificate, voting rights lost pursuant to W.S.

6-10-106

shall be deemed restored. The department of corrections shall automatically issue a person convicted of a nonviolent felony or nonviolent felonies arising out of the same occurrence or related course of events a certificate of restoration of voting rights if:

The person has not been convicted of any other felony other than convictions arising out of the same occurrence or related course of events for which restoration of rights is certified; and

The person has completed all of his sentence, including probation or parole.

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 189, § 2.

The department of corrections shall issue a certificate of restoration of voting rights to eligible persons as follows:

For persons convicted within Wyoming of a nonviolent felony or nonviolent felonies arising out of the same occurrence or related course of events who completed their sentence before January 1, 2010, the department shall require receipt of a written request on a form prescribed by the department and issue each eligible person a certificate of restoration of voting rights following a determination that the person has completed his sentence, including probation and parole. The department shall not require an application for restoration before issuing a certificate to eligible persons who complete their sentence on and after January 1, 2010;

For persons convicted outside of Wyoming or under federal law of a nonviolent felony or nonviolent felonies arising out of the same occurrence or related course of events, the department shall issue each eligible person a certificate of restoration of voting rights upon receipt of a written request on a form prescribed by the department and following a determination that the person has completed his sentence, including probation and parole.

The department of correction’s determination that a person is ineligible for a certificate of restoration of voting rights is a final action of the agency subject to judicial review. The clerk of the district court and the division of criminal investigation shall cooperate with the department of corrections in providing information necessary for determining a person’s eligibility to receive a certificate of restoration of voting rights. The department of corrections shall notify the secretary of state when any person’s voting rights have been restored. If the person was convicted in Wyoming, the department of corrections shall submit the certificate of restoration of voting rights to the clerk of the district court in which the person was convicted and the clerk shall file the certificate in the criminal case in which the conviction was entered.

As used in this section:

“Same occurrence or related course of events” means the same transaction or occurrence or a series of events closely related in time or location;

Violent felony” means as defined by W.S. 6-1-104(a)(xii), including offenses committed in another jurisdiction which if committed in this state would constitute a violent felony under W.S. 6-1-104(a)(xii). Nonviolent felony” includes all felony offenses not otherwise defined as violent felonies.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 18, § 4; C.S. 1910, § 525; C.S. 1920, § 585; R.S. 1931, § 108-810; C.S. 1945, § 19-1004; W.S. 1957, § 7-311; W.S. 1977, §

7-13-107

; Laws 1981, ch. 161, § 1; 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 2003, ch. 132, § 1; 2015 ch. 163, § 1, effective January 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 189, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, rewrote the intro of (b);
in (b)(i), substituted “person” for “applicant”,
not” for “never”, inserted “or related
course of events” and substituted “certified”
for “sought”; in (b)(ii), substituted “The person
has completed all of his” for “All of the applicant's
terms of” and “including probation or parole”
for “are expired, or in the case of probation, the applicant
has completed all probation periods”; rewrote (c) and added
(c)(i) and (ii); added (d); redesignated former (d) as present (e),
added (e)(i), in (e)(ii), deleted “As used in this section,”.

The 2017 amendments. —

, The first 2017 amendment, by ch. 189, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in the last sentence of the introductory language of (b), added “automatically” following “corrections shall”; rewrote (c)(i); at the end of (c)(ii), substituted “issue each eligible person a certificate of restoration of voting rights upon receipt of a written request on a form prescribed by the department and following a determination that the person has completed his sentence, including probation and parole” for “application for restoration before issuing a certificate to an eligible person;”; and at the beginning of (d), substituted “department of correction's determination that a person is ineligible for” for “department's denial of”, and added “of correction” in the last sentence.

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 189, § 2,
effective July 1, 2017, deleted former ()(iii), which read: “It has been at least five (5) years since the expiration of all of the applicant's terms of sentence, or in the case of probation, the completion of all probation periods.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (b)(i), added “and” at the end; in (b)(ii), deleted “and” at the end; and, in (c)(ii), deleted “require an” following “department shall.”.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Editor’s Note. —

Laws 2015, ch. 163, § 3 states as follows: “This act shall not affect the validity of voting rights restored prior to the effective date of this act.”

Laws 2015, ch. 163, §
5(b) states as follows: “Except as provided by subsection (a) of this section, this act is effective January 1, 2016.”

Constitutionality of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-10-106

. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-13-105

provides a mechanism for convicted felons to re-qualify as electors after the prison term has ended or after probation. Woodruff v. Wyoming, 49 Fed. Appx. 199,

2002 U.S. App. LEXIS 21060

(10th Cir. Wyo. 2002).

Applied

in

Mills v. Campbell County Canvassing Bd., 707 P.2d 747,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 588

(Wyo. 1985).

Quoted

in

Blake v. Rupe, 651 P.2d 1096,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 383

(Wyo. 1982).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 7-13-106.
Transfer of citizen or national of foreign country.

The governor may act on behalf of the state to consent to the transfer of a citizen or national of a foreign country pursuant to a treaty between the United States and the foreign country of which the person is a citizen or national.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 22, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

7-13-108

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

§ 7-13-107.
Split sentence of incarceration in county jail followed by probation; civil liability of county officers and employees.

Following a defendant’s conviction of, or his plea of guilty to any felony, other than a felony punishable by death or life imprisonment, the court may impose any sentence of imprisonment authorized by law and except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, may in addition provide:

That the defendant be confined in the county jail for a period of not more than one (1) year; and

That the execution of the remainder of the sentence be suspended and the defendant placed on probation.

In placing the defendant on probation under subsection (a) of this section, the court may also:

Impose any fine provided by the statute violated;

Apply the provisions of W.S.

7-13-501

through

7-13-503

.

Except as provided in subsection (a) of this section, the court may impose a split sentence of incarceration followed by probation in any felony case including those in which the statute violated specifically provides for a sentence of imprisonment in the state penitentiary.

The court may impose a split sentence as provided by this section at the time a defendant is originally sentenced or at any hearing at which the court modifies or revokes a defendant’s probation and at which the defendant is personally present.

The cost of housing convicted felons in the county jail shall be paid by the department of corrections by contract arrangement with the county sheriff. Costs shall include shelter, food, clothing, and necessary medical, dental and hospital care. Subject to legislative appropriation, the department of corrections may contract with county sheriffs to house felons sentenced under this section in county jail.

If any civil action is brought against any sheriff, his under sheriff, deputy, agent or employee, by reason of acts committed or allegedly committed in the performance of necessary duties in connection with the housing and care of the convicted felons, the state shall indemnify and hold harmless the officers, agents or employees from all civil liability incurred or adjudged except punitive damage awards. Upon request, the state shall provide legal counsel at state expense to assist in the defense of any action referred to in this subsection.

No person convicted of a felony may be sentenced to the county jail under this section unless:

The judge, after consultation with the sheriff, determines that adequate facilities are available and that the jail is not overcrowded; and

Funding exists to pay the cost of placement, in that:

The legislature has specifically appropriated funds to pay for such placements and unencumbered appropriated funds are available for the proposed placement; or

The county agrees to pay the costs of placement if sufficient funds are not available from state appropriations.

A defendant sentenced under this section is not eligible for parole and is not subject to good time allowances authorized under W.S.

7-13-420

. The sentencing court shall continue to have jurisdiction over the defendant during the entire time he is confined in county jail and thereafter while the defendant is serving his term of probation.

If consecutive terms of confinement in the county jail are ordered pursuant to this section they shall not exceed a period of one (1) year.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 57, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

7-13-109

; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 7-13-110; Laws 1986, ch. 63, § 1; 1987, ch. 157, § 3; ch. 205, § 1; 1989, ch. 91, § 1; 1990, ch. 16, § 1; 1992, ch. 25, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

“Classical split sentence.” —

In a classical split sentence, the district court imposes an established sentence that includes incarceration in the county jail for a period of not more than one year with probation to follow the confinement for the balance of the established sentence. Kidd v. State, 937 P.2d 1334,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1997), overruled in part, Daugherty v. State, 2002 WY 52, 44 P.3d 28,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2002).

When the original sentence is a classical split sentence, the district court is limited to resentencing the defendant after his probation has been revoked to serve a period of confinement that is equal to or less than the time remaining on his original probation. Kidd v. State, 937 P.2d 1334,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1997), overruled in part, Daugherty v. State, 2002 WY 52, 44 P.3d 28,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2002).

A sentence that required defendant to complete four years of supervised probation and, as a condition of the probation, to serve a 90-day term in the county jail, was a “classical split sentence”; the sentence did not indicate that the trial court intended to retain the right to completely resentence defendant in the event the probation was revoked. Kidd v. State, 937 P.2d 1334,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1997), overruled in part, Daugherty v. State, 2002 WY 52, 44 P.3d 28,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2002).

“Probationary split sentence.” —

A probationary split sentence consists of incarceration in the county jail for a period of not more than one year followed by a stated period of probation with sentencing being postponed subject to entry in the event that probation is revoked. Kidd v. State, 937 P.2d 1334,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1997), overruled in part, Daugherty v. State, 2002 WY 52, 44 P.3d 28,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2002).

When the sentence is a probationary split sentence, the sentencing judge may resentence the defendant after his probation has been revoked to serve any term that could have originally been imposed for the commission of the crime. Kidd v. State, 937 P.2d 1334,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1997), overruled in part, Daugherty v. State, 2002 WY 52, 44 P.3d 28,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2002).

When defendant pled guilty to one felony count of interference with a peace officer, he was sentenced to prison for a period of not less than three years nor more than six years; defendant's sentence was suspended pursuant to the split sentencing provision of this section, and he was ordered to serve 180 days in the county jail followed by four years of probation. After defendant admitted five violations of his probationary conditions, probation was revoked and the district court did not abuse its discretion in reimposing sentence.
Castillo v. State, 2012 WY 3, 268 P.3d 245,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 2012).

The differences in character between the two types of split sentences

define the residual sentencing discretion retained by the district court upon revocation; in the case of the classical split sentence, only the period remaining upon revocation can be enforced by confinement but the probationary split sentence permits the sentencing judge to resentence to any sentence which might have originally been imposed. Wlodarczyk v. State, 836 P.2d 279,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1992), overruled in part, Daugherty v. State, 2002 WY 52, 44 P.3d 28,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2002).

Probation violations determined under Rules of Criminal Procedure. —

If a defendant is given a “split sentence” (incarceration followed by probation) pursuant to this section, probation violations will likewise be determined under the sentencing court's continued jurisdiction during the period of probation pursuant to the Wyoming Criminal Rules of Procedure. Wlodarczyk v. State, 836 P.2d 279,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1992), overruled in part, Daugherty v. State, 2002 WY 52, 44 P.3d 28,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2002).

Distinction between classical split and probationary split sentences abrogated. —

Prior to utilizing split sentencing, the sentencing court must impose a minimum and maximum term sentence. The holdings of Wlodarczyk v. State, 836 P.2d 279,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1992), overruled on other grounds, Daugherty v. State, 2002 WY 52, 44 P.3d 28,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2002), and Kidd v. State, 937 P.2d 1334,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1997), overruled in part, Daugherty v. State, 2002 WY 52, 44 P.3d 28,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2002).

Double jeopardy prevents imposition of sentence longer than original sentence. —

Jeopardy attaches at the time a defendant sentenced under this section begins to serve his confinement term and the underlying constitutional principle of double jeopardy prevents imposition of a longer sentence than was originally imposed. Wlodarczyk v. State, 836 P.2d 279,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1992), overruled in part, Daugherty v. State, 2002 WY 52, 44 P.3d 28,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2002).

Split sentence properly rejected. —

District court's rationale for rejecting the plea agreement (a split sentencing agreement which would have allowed for incarceration in the county jail and then supervised probation) was very similar to its later rationale for incarcerating defendant. In both instances, the district court stated that, under the totality of the circumstances (high blood alcohol content, driving on the wrong side of the road, other near accidents, and a prior drunk driving offense), probation would have sent the wrong message to the public. Cohee v. State, 2005 WY 50, 110 P.3d 267,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 2005).

Illegal sentence. —

Because this section does not authorize the imposition of probation and detention at the same time, which are incompatible and mutually exclusive as indicated in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 6-5-201(a)(ii), 7-13-401(a)(x) as construed together, a sentence that deemed defendant both on probation and in detention during release from jail for alcohol treatment was illegal.
Endris v. State, 2010 WY 73, 233 P.3d 578,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 2010).

Applied

in

Paugh v. State, 9 P.3d 973,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2000).

Cited

in

Smith v. State, 902 P.2d 1271,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1995); Pearl v. State, 996 P.2d 688,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 7-13-108.
Sentence to custody of department of corrections.

Unless otherwise specifically provided by statute, any person convicted of a felony and sentenced to a term of imprisonment shall be sentenced to the custody and control of the department of corrections to be incarcerated in a state penal institution or other facility under contract or agreement with the department pursuant to W.S. 25-1-105(e), as directed by the department.

Any contract entered into under W.S. 25-1-105(e) shall be approved as to form and content by the Wyoming attorney general.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 25, § 2; 1996, ch. 1, § 314; 1996, ch. 32, § 1; 1998, ch. 30, § 315; ch. 60, § 1.

§ 7-13-109.
Payment of jail costs by inmate.

In addition to any other punishment prescribed by law, the sentencing court may require a person sentenced to confinement in county jail, for any offense, to pay the jail facility the costs of room and board for each day of incarceration, both before and after conviction. The costs for room and board for each day of incarceration shall be an amount equal to the actual cost of the services as determined by the county sheriff. The cost of the services shall be paid to all jail facilities where the inmate may have been held before and after conviction. The costs shall not be assessed if:

The court finds that the defendant has no ability to pay and that no reasonable probability exists that the defendant will have an ability to pay; or

In the judgment of the court, the costs would impose a manifest hardship on the inmate, or the property of the inmate is needed for the maintenance and support of the inmate’s family.

An order to pay room and board costs under this section shall be included as a special order in the judgment of conviction. To satisfy the order, the clerk of the sentencing court, upon request of the sheriff or prosecuting attorney, may issue execution against any assets of the defendant including wages subject to attachment, in the same manner as in a civil action.

Willful failure or refusal to pay costs ordered under this section is punishable as contempt of court.

Any costs paid by a person under this section shall be deposited in the county general fund to help defray the costs the jail facility incurred in providing room and board to the person.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 3, § 1.

Applicability. —

Presentence
confinement costs assessment, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-13-109(a), had to be vacated because the statute only applied to
those sentenced to jail, and defendant was sentenced to prison. Pfeil v. State, 2014 WY 137, 336 P.3d 1206,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 2014).

This section does not permit imposition of costs for confinement in Wyoming state penitentiary. Lee v. State, 2 P.3d 517,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 2000), dismissed, 2007 WY 81, 157 P.3d 947,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 2007).